Florida, session 2026, HB483.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
67
68 Section 1. Paragraph (m) is added to subsection (4) of
69 section 20.60, Florida Statutes, to read:
70 20.60 Department of Commerce; creation; powers and
71 duties.—
72 (4) The purpose of the department is to assist the
73 Governor in working with the Legislature, state agencies,
74 business leaders, and economic development professionals to
75 formulate and implement coherent and consistent policies and
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
76 strategies designed to promote economic opportunities for all
77 Floridians. The department is the state's chief agency for
78 business recruitment and expansion and economic development. To
79 accomplish such purposes, the department shall:
80 (m) Encourage and oversee manufacturing in this state in
81 coordination with the Chief Manufacturing Officer.
82 Section 2. Section 20.602, Florida Statutes, is created to
83 read:
84 20.602 Chief Manufacturing Officer.—
85 (1) There is designated among the senior leadership of the
86 Department of Commerce a Chief Manufacturing Officer for the
87 purpose of supporting the manufacturing ecosystem statewide. The
88 Chief Manufacturing Officer is appointed by and serves at the
89 pleasure of the Secretary of Commerce.
90 (2) The Chief Manufacturing Officer shall do all of the
91 following:
92 (a) Serve as a subject-matter expert for the state on
93 issues related to manufacturing.
94 (b) Promote and coordinate manufacturing efforts in this
95 state and identify gaps across state-supported activities.
96 (c) Provide strategic direction for interagency and cross-
97 disciplinary initiatives to promote and support manufacturing in
98 this state.
99 (d) Work with federal, state, regional, and local
100 governmental entities and nongovernmental entities to align
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
101 manufacturing priorities.
102 (e) Engage with state agencies and water management
103 districts to create processes, programs, decision frameworks,
104 and reporting mechanisms intended to support manufacturing in
105 this state.
106 (f) Collaborate with the Department of Education, school
107 districts, charter schools, technical colleges, state colleges,
108 and regional workforce development boards to promote
109 manufacturing as a career path. Such collaboration must include
110 all of the following:
111 1. Supporting curriculum development and career awareness
112 initiatives in elementary and middle schools, including
113 classroom resources, career fairs, and outreach activities
114 designed to inspire interest in manufacturing.
115 2. Establishing technology demonstration centers, work-
116 based learning opportunities, and exposure to manufacturing
117 careers through partnerships with guidance counselors and
118 recognized career exploration programs, including Project Lead
119 The Way.
120 3. Preserving and expanding manufacturing programs in high
121 schools, promoting dual enrollment and industry certifications,
122 and ensuring that course selection and grade point average
123 weighting policies encourage students to pursue, rather than
124 discourage them from pursuing, manufacturing tracks.
125 4. Funding and supporting regional manufacturing training
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
126 centers to provide multiple entry points for careers in
127 manufacturing, including awareness initiatives for
128 underrepresented populations and individuals reentering the
129 workforce.
130 5. Reenergizing the marketing and promotion of
131 manufacturing careers in coordination with the Florida
132 Manufacturing Promotional Campaign created in s. 288.1031, using
133 messaging tailored to the interests and language of today's
134 youth.
135 (3) All state and local governmental entities shall assist
136 the Chief Manufacturing Officer to the extent such assistance is
137 consistent with law and with budgetary constraints.
138 (4) The department shall prepare a report, in consultation
139 with the Chief Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute
140 of Standards and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership
141 organization in this state, regarding manufacturing efforts in
142 this state. The department shall submit the report to the
143 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
144 House of Representatives by December 15, 2027, and every 2 years
145 thereafter. The report must include information regarding the
146 strength and economic importance of the manufacturing industry
147 in this state.
148 Section 3. Section 288.103, Florida Statutes, is created
149 to read:
150 288.103 Florida Manufacturers' Workforce Development Grant
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
151 Program.—
152 (1) The Florida Manufacturers' Workforce Development Grant
153 Program is created within the Department of Commerce, under the
154 direction of the Chief Manufacturing Officer in consultation
155 with the National Institute of Standards and Technology
156 Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization in this state,
157 to fund proposed projects, subject to appropriation by the
158 Legislature, which support small manufacturers in this state
159 with the deployment of new technologies or cybersecurity
160 infrastructure and to strengthen the manufacturing workforce
161 pipeline from elementary education through postsecondary
162 training and workforce reentry.
163 (2) The department, in coordination with the Chief
164 Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute of Standards
165 and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization
166 in this state, shall review submitted applications and select
167 projects for awards which create strategic investments in
168 workforce training and education partnerships to facilitate the
169 deployment of new technologies or cybersecurity infrastructure
170 and to expand career awareness and preparation for manufacturing
171 occupations across the K-12, postsecondary, and workforce
172 training systems. Final grant awards are made at the sole
173 discretion of the department.
174 (3) The department, in coordination with the Chief
175 Manufacturing Officer and the National Institute of Standards
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
176 and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership organization
177 in this state, shall establish and publish ranking metrics for
178 reviewing grants and awarding them to applicants on a
179 competitive basis. Metrics may include the number of employees,
180 matching funds pledged by the applicant, and expected benefits
181 from the grant award. Priority must be given to projects with
182 innovative plans, advanced technologies, and development
183 strategies that focus on workforce development for small
184 manufacturers across this state and that include one or more of
185 the following:
186 (a) Establishment or expansion of regional manufacturing
187 training centers.
188 (b) Partnerships with the Department of Education, school
189 districts, charter schools, technical colleges, and state
190 colleges to support manufacturing curricula, dual enrollment,
191 and industry certification programs.
192 (c) Development of elementary and middle school career
193 awareness programs, including technology demonstration centers
194 and guidance counselor resources.
195 (d) Outreach and training programs targeting
196 underrepresented populations, including reentry populations.
197 (e) Marketing and promotion of manufacturing careers
198 consistent with s. 288.1031.
199 (4) Applicants may seek funding for workforce development
200 and operations; however, grant funding awarded under this
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
201 section may not be used to pay salary and benefits or general
202 business or office expenses. Grants awarded under the program
203 shall be administered by the department from the Economic
204 Development Trust Fund established in s. 288.095.
205 (5) The department shall annually provide a list to the
206 public of each project awarded a grant, the benefit of each
207 project in meeting the goals and objectives of the program, and
208 the current status of each project. The department shall include
209 such information in the annual incentives report required under
210 s. 288.0065.
211 (6) The department may adopt rules to implement this
212 section.
213 Section 4. Section 288.1031, Florida Statutes, is created
214 to read:
215 288.1031 Florida Manufacturing Promotional Campaign.—
216 (1) The Legislature finds that there is a need for a
217 campaign to increase consumer awareness of manufacturing
218 activities in this state, to expand market exposure for
219 manufactured products and goods in this state, and to inspire
220 future generations of entrepreneurs, fabricators, and skilled
221 workers to build and grow domestic businesses and manufacturing
222 operations in this state. The Legislature further finds that a
223 campaign that creates a partnership between the state and
224 manufacturers in this state is necessary to promote and
225 advertise manufactured products efficiently.
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
226 (2) As used in this section, the term:
227 (a) "Manufactured product" means any tangible personal
228 property or consumer good, whether a durable or nondurable good,
229 that has been processed, fabricated, or produced, often through
230 industrial or mechanical processes. The term includes items sold
231 or leased to consumers.
232 (b) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, a
233 corporation, an association, a business, a trust, a legal
234 representative, or any other business unit.
235 (3) The Florida Manufacturing Promotional Campaign is
236 created within the department. The Chief Manufacturing Officer
237 shall administer the campaign in coordination with the National
238 Institute of Standards and Technology Manufacturing Extension
239 Partnership organization in this state. The purpose of the
240 campaign is to serve as a voluntary marketing program to promote
241 manufacturing products and businesses in this state.
242 (4) The department shall do all of the following:
243 (a) Develop logos for the campaign and authorize the use
244 of such logos by rule.
245 (b) Create promotional materials for the campaign.
246 (c) Register campaign participants.
247 (d) Develop in-kind advertising programs.
248 (e) Contract with media representatives for the purpose of
249 dispersing promotional materials.
250 (5) A person who produces manufactured products may
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 483 2026
251 participate in the campaign only by registering annually with
252 the department. The department shall establish by rule the form
253 and manner of registration.
254 (6) The department shall adopt rules to implement and
255 administer the campaign. By rule, the department shall establish
256 the logos or product identifiers to be depicted for use in the
257 campaign for advertising, publicizing, and promoting the sale of
258 manufactured products in this state. The department shall also
259 adopt rules necessary to ensure compliance with the campaign and
260 to govern participant registration.
261 (7) The department shall annually create a report on the
262 success of the campaign, including detailed performance measures
263 and outcomes, sources of in-kind advertising, contracts related
264 to disbursement of promotional materials, the names of persons
265 participating in the campaign, and other information for the
266 campaign. The department shall submit the report as part of the
267 annual report required in s. 20.602(4).
268 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb483-00